District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

2-308.19

Civil investigative demands.

Recodified as § 2-381.07.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 819, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 10(e), 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 122, 47 DCR 520